I think you need an understanding of the new relationship.
And that relationship can only be established by the freedom of both sides. 'Marriage,' he repulsed.
'Yes, I believe the divorce.
Yes, the divorce, &quot; red &quot;, repeated Stepan Arkadić. 'This is in all respects the most reasonable way out for spouses in relationships like you.
What if the couple found that life was impossible for them to live together?
It can always happen. 'Alexei Alexandrovich sighed heavily and closed his eyes. 'There is only one consideration: does one of the spouses wish to marry another?
If not, it is very simple,' said Stepan Arkadić, more and more free of embarrassment.
Alexei Alexandrovich said something to himself when he shrivelled with excitement, and he didn't answer anything.
All that was so easy for Stepan Arkadyić was thinking a thousand times about Alexei Alexandrovich.
And he didn't just think it was easy, but it seemed impossible.
The divorce, the details of which he had already known, now seemed impossible to him because his self - dignity and respect for religion prevented him from accepting the charge of false adultery and even less allowing his wife, who was forgiven and loved by him, to be caught and humiliated.
Divorce was not possible for other, even more important reasons.
What will happen to your son in the event of a divorce?
It was impossible to leave him with his mother. A divorced mother will have an illegal family in which the stepchild's position and upbringing are likely to be bad.
Leave him with me?
He knew it would be revenge on his part, and he didn't want it.
But apart from that, it seemed impossible for Alexei Alexandrovich to divorce because by agreeing to divorce, he had destroyed Anna by doing so.
He was moved by the word of Daria Alexandrovna in Moscow that when he decided to divorce, he thought of himself, not that he was destroying her irretrievably.
And by linking that word to his forgiveness, to his affection for his children, he now understood it in his own way.
To agree to a divorce, to give her freedom was to take away the last link to the lives of the children he loved, and she had the last pillar in the way of good and to bring her to ruin.
If she was divorced by her wife, he knew that she would be united with Vronski, and that connection would be illegal and criminal, because the wife, in the sense of the church law, could not be married as long as the husband was alive.
"She'll connect with him, and in a year or two, either he'll leave her or she'll get in touch with her again," Alexanderovich thought. 'And by agreeing to an illegal divorce, I will be responsible for her destruction.'
He thought about it hundreds of times and was convinced that the divorce case was not only not very simple, as his brother-in-law said, but completely impossible.
He did not believe any word of Stepan Arkadiyić, for every word he had had thousands of rebuttals, but he listened to him, feeling that his words were expressed by the powerful rude force that guided his life and that he would have to submit to.
'The only question is, under what conditions do you agree to divorce?'
She doesn't want anything, she doesn't dare ask you, she gives everything to your generosity.
"Oh, my God!
Oh, my God! For what?" 'I thought Alexi Alexandrovich, remembering the details of the divorce in which the husband took the blame, and by the same gesture as the one that was closed up, covered his face with shame.'
'You're excited, I get it.
But if you think about it...
"And put the left in the right cheek, and hand over the shirt to the man who took off the kaftan," Alexander thought.
'Yes, yes! 'He cried with a squealing voice,' said he, 'I take shame, I give up even my son, but...' but wouldn't it be better to leave it?
Anyway, do what you want... and he turned his back on his brother-in-law, so he can't see him, sit on the chair by the window.
He was bitter; he was ashamed; but along with this grief and shame he felt joy and compassion at the height of his humility.
Stepan Arkadić was touched.
He's quiet.
'Alexei Alexandrovich, believe me, that she will appreciate your generosity,' he said. 'But it must have been God's will,' he added, and when he said it, he felt that it was foolish, and with difficulty held the smile over his stupidity.
Alexei Alexandrovich wanted to answer something, but the tears stopped him.
'It is a fateful disaster, and I must admit it. I acknowledge this misery by fact, and I am trying to help her and you,' said Stepan Arkadić.
When Stepan Arkadić left his son-in-law's room, he was moved, but that did not prevent him from being satisfied that he had successfully done the job because he was confident that he would not give up his words.
This pleasure was also compounded by the fact that he had the idea that, when this was done, he would ask his wife and loved ones, "What's the difference between me and the king?
The king divorces -- and no one feels better about it, and I divorce, and the three of them get better...
Or, what is the resemblance between me and the king?
When...
I'll come up with a better one, though,' he said to himself with a smile.
The wound was dangerous, even though it passed the heart. And for a few days, he was between life and death.
When he was able to speak the first time, one Varya, his brother's wife, was in his room.
'Varya!' he said, looking closely at her, 'I shot myself accidentally.
And please don't ever talk about it and tell everyone.
That's too stupid!
Without responding to his words, Varia leaned over him and looked him in the face with a happy smile.
The eyes were bright, not feverish, but the expression was strict.
'Well, thank God!' she said. 'Doesn't it hurt?
'A little here. 'He pointed to the breasts.
'So let me tie you up.'
He silently squeezed his wide cheekbones and looked at her while she tied him up.
When she came, he said,
'I'm not delusional; please make sure there's no talk that I shot myself on purpose.
'No one speaks.'
I just hope you don't accidentally shoot again,' she said with a question-and-answer smile.
'I shouldn't have, but it would have been better... and he smiled darkly.'
Despite these words and the smile that scared Varia so much when he was inflammated and recovered, he felt that he had completely freed himself from one part of his grief.
It was as if he had washed away the shame and humiliation that he had experienced before.
He could think calmly now about Alexei Alexandrovich. He acknowledged his generosity and no longer felt humiliated.
Besides, he's back in his old life.
He saw the opportunity to look people in the eye without shame and could live by his habits.
One thing he couldn't get out of his heart, even though he continued to struggle with that feeling, was the despairing regret that he had lost her forever.
Now that he had redeemed himself before his husband, he had to give up on her, and had never returned to her with her repentance and her husband, it was firmly decided in his heart; but he could not remove from his heart the regret for the loss of her love, nor could he erase in memory the moments of happiness that he had known with her, which they had so little value at that time, and which, in all their charms, persecuted him now.
Serpukhovski came up with an assignment to Tashkent, and Wronski agreed to the offer without any hesitation.
But the closer he got to the time of his departure, the harder it became for him the sacrifice he made for what he thought was right.
His wound healed and he was on his way to Tashkent to prepare for his departure.
"One time to see her and then to bury herself, to die," he thought, and when he made farewell visits, he expressed that thought to Betsy.
With this embassy, Betsy went to see Anne, and she gave him a negative answer.
"The better," he thought, after receiving this news. 'It was a weakness that would destroy my last powers.'
On the other day, Betsy herself came to see him in the morning and announced that she had received positive news through Oblon, that Alexei Alexandrovich was giving a divorce and that he could see her.
Without even taking care of Betsy's self, forgetting all his decisions, not asking when or where his husband might be, he immediately went to Karenin's.
He ran into the stairwell, seeing no one and seeing nothing, and came into her room as quickly as he could tossed away from running.
And without thinking or seeing who was in the room or not, he hugged her and began to kiss her face, hands, and neck.
Anna was preparing for this date, thinking about what she would say to him, but she did not have time to say any of it: His passion enveloped her.
She wanted to get rid of him, to get rid of herself, but it was too late.
His feelings came to her.
Her lips shivered so she couldn't say anything for a long time.
'Yes, you possessed me, and I am yours,' she finally said, holding his hand to her chest.
'That's how it should have been!' he said. 'As long as we're alive, it has to be.
I know that now.
'It is true,' she said, paler and more and hugging his head. 'There's something awful about it after all that's happened.
'It will pass, it will pass, we will be so happy!
Our love, if it could be strengthened, would be strengthened by having something terrible in it,' he said, raising his head and opening his smile to his strong teeth.
And she couldn't help but smile -- not words, but in love with his eyes.
She took his hand and ironed herself with it on the cold cheeks and cut her hair.
'I don't recognize you with these short hairs. You look so good.
Boy. But how pale you are!
'Yes, I am very weak,' she said, smiling. And her lips trembled again.
'We will go to Italy, you will recover,' he said.
'Is it possible for us to be like a husband with a wife, alone with your family with you? 'She said, looking closely into his eyes.'
'I was only surprised how it could have been otherwise.'
'Steve says that he agrees to everything, but I cannot accept his generosity,' she said, looking thoughtfully past the face of Vronski. 'I don't want a divorce, I don't care anymore.
I just don't know what he's gonna decide about Serez.
He couldn't figure out how she could at that moment think about and remember her son, about the divorce.
Didn't you care?
'Don't talk about it, don't think about it,' he said, turning her hand in his hand and trying to draw her attention to herself; but she did not look at him all the time.
'Oh, why didn't I die, it would have been better!' she said, and without crying, tears rose on both cheeks; but she tried to smile, not to grieve him.
It would be shameful and impossible to give up a flattering and dangerous assignment to Tashkent, in the old sense of Vronski.
But now, without thinking for a moment, he gave up on him and immediately resigned as a result of his highest rejection of what he had done.
After a month, he was left alone with his son in her apartment, and Anna and Wronski went abroad without getting a divorce and firmly abandoned him.
PART FIFTH
Princess Shcherbatsky found it impossible to get the wedding to the post, which was five weeks away, because half of the dowry could not keep up with that time; but she could not help but agree with Levin that it would be too late after the post, since the old aunt of Prince Shcherbatsky was very ill and could soon have died, and the mourning would have delayed the wedding.
Therefore, when she decided to divide the dowry into two parts, a large and small dowry, the Princess agreed to make the wedding to the post.
She decided that she would make a small portion of the dowry now, that she would send a great deal after, and she was very angry with Levin for not being able to answer her seriously whether he agreed or not.
This consideration was all the more convenient because the young people were travelling immediately after the wedding to a village where large dowry items would not be needed.
Levin continued to be in the same state of insanity in which he felt that he and his happiness were the main and only goal of all that existed and that he now needed nothing to think about and care for, that everything was being done and would be done differently for him.
He had no plan or purpose for the life to come; he gave it to others, knowing that everything would be fine.
His brother Sergei Ivanovic, Stepan Arkadić, and the Princess led him in what he should have done.
He only agreed with everything he was offered.
His brother borrowed money for him, and the Princess advised him to leave Moscow after the wedding. Stepan Arkadić advised us to go abroad.
He agreed to everything.
"Do whatever you want if you're having fun.
I am happy, and my happiness can be no more, no less, no matter what you do,' he thought.
When he handed over to Kitty the advice of Stepan Arkadyić to travel abroad, he was very surprised that she did not agree to it, but had certain requirements for their future life.
She knew Levin had a case in the village he loved.
Not only did she not understand the case, but she didn't want to understand it.
This, however, did not prevent her from considering the matter very important. So she knew that their house would be in the village, and she wished to go not abroad, where she would not live, but where their house would be.
This express intention surprised Levin. But since he didn't care, he immediately asked Stepan Arkadyić, as if it were his duty, to go to the village and arrange for everything he knew, with the taste he had so much.
'Listen, though,' said Stepan Arkadić to Levin, returning from the village where he had arranged everything for the young to come, 'you have a witness that you were in the spirit?
Why?
'You can't marry without it.
'Ooh, ouch, ouch! 'Screamed Levin.' 'I don't think I've been naked for nine years.
I didn't think so.
'Enough!' said Stepan Arkadych, laughing, 'and you call me a nihilist!
But that can't be done. You've got to shove.
'When?
Four days to go.
Stepan Arkadych arranged this, too.
And Levin began to bleed.
For Levin, as a man who does not believe but respects the beliefs of others, the presence and participation in all church rites was very difficult.
Now, in the sensitive, mild state of spirit in which he was, this need to pretend was not only hard, but it seemed impossible.
Now, in his glory, in his bloom, he must either lie or malign.
He felt unable to do either.
But how many times did he interrogate Stepan Arkadyić, if he could obtain a certificate without beef, Stepan Arkadić announced that it was impossible.
'What do you think you should do -- two days?
And he's a sweet, smart old man.
He's gonna pull that tooth out of you in a way you won't notice.
While standing at the first luncheon, Levin tried to refresh the youth's memories of the strong religious feeling he had experienced between the ages of 16 and 17.
But I immediately found that it was absolutely impossible for him to do so.
He tried to view all of this as an unimportant, empty custom like the custom of making visits; but he felt that he could not do that either.
Levin was in the most uncertain position with regard to religion, like most of its contemporaries.
He could not believe, but he was not firmly convinced that all of this was unfair.
And so, without being able to believe in the significance of what he did, or to look at it indifferently as an empty formality, throughout this shit, he felt embarrassed and embarrassed, doing things he didn't understand, and because, as the inner voice told him, something lies and bad.
During his service, he listened to prayers, trying to attribute to them meanings that were not at variance with his views, feeling that he could not understand and should condemn them, tried not to listen to them, but rather to his thoughts, observations, and memories, which were wandering around in his head during the celebration of the church.
He stood by the luncheon, the all-powerful and the evening rules, and on the other day, he came to church at 8 a.m. to hear the morning rules and confess.
There was no one in the church but a poor soldier, two old ladies and churchmen.
The young deacon, with two sharply marked halves of a long back under a thin arm, met him and immediately approached the table by the wall and began to read the rules.
As we read it, especially with the frequent and rapid repetition of the same words: "Lord, have mercy," which sounded like a "pardon, have mercy", Levin felt that his thought was locked and sealed and that it was no longer necessary to touch and move it, or that there would be confusion, so he stood behind the deacon and continued, without listening or understanding, to think about his own.
"A surprising amount of expression in her hand," he thought, remembering how they sat at the corner table yesterday.
There was nothing to say to them, as was always the case at that time, and she put her hand on the table, opened and closed it, and laughed at its motion.
He remembered how he kissed that hand and then looked at the similarities on his pink hand.
"Again with a mercy," thought Levin, being baptized, bowing and looking at the flexible movement of the back of a bowing deacon.
"She then took my hand and looked at the lines: 'You have a good hand,' she said.
And he looked at his hand and the short hand of the Deacon.
"Yes, it will soon be over," he thought. 'No, it seems at first again,' he thought, listening to prayers. 'No, it's over; now he's bowing to the ground.
It's always at the end."
The deacon said that he would write it down, and when he heard new boots on the stoves of an empty church, he went to the altar.
A minute later, he looked out of there and lured Levin.
A locked thought so far has moved in Levin's head, but he has hastened to drive her away.
"Someday he'll settle down," he thought, and went to the amvon.
He went into the steps, and turned to the right, and saw the priest.
The old priest, with a rare, semi - neighbouring beard, with tired, good eyes, stood by the analoy and turned the stub.
After a little bowing to Levin, he immediately began reading with the usual voice of prayer.
After completing them, he bowed to the ground and turned his face to Levin.
'Here Christ is invisible, accepting your confession,' he said, pointing to the crucifixion. 'Do you believe in all that the Holy Apostolic Church teaches us? 'The priest continued, turning his eyes on Levin's face and putting his hands under the epetrahill.
'I doubted, I doubt everything,' said Levin with a distasteful voice and shut up.
The priest waited a few seconds for him to say something else, and when he closed his eyes, the quick Vladimirian on "O" said:
'The doubt is inherent in human weakness, but we must pray that the merciful God will strengthen us.
What special sins do you have? 'He added without any further delay, as if he was trying not to waste any time.'
'My greatest sin is doubt.
I doubt everything, and I'm more of a doubter.
'The doubt is inherent in the weakness of man,' the priest repeated the same words. 'What is the majority of your doubts?'
'I doubt everything.'
I doubt sometimes even the existence of a god,' said Levin involuntarily, and was apprehensive about what he said.
But Levin's words did not seem to impress the priest.
'What doubts can there be about the existence of a god?' 'Had a slight smile,' he said in haste.
Levin was silent.
'What doubt can you have about the Creator when you see his creation? 'The priest continued with a quick, usual talk.' 'Who decorated the heaven's sky with lights?
Who placed the earth in the beauty of its beauty?
What about without a creator? 'He said, looking at Levin in question.
Levin felt that it would be indecent to enter into a philosophical debate with a priest, and therefore only said in reply what was directly relevant to the question.
'I don't know,' he said.
'You don't know?
How then do you doubt that Allah has created all things? 'The priest said with a merry perplexation.'
'I don't understand anything,' said Levin, blushing and feeling that his words were stupid and that they could not help being stupid in such a situation.
'Call on God and ask him.
Even holy fathers had doubts and asked God to strengthen their faith.
The Devil has great power, and we must not give in to him.
Pray to God, pray to him, pray to God,' he repeated in haste.
The priest's been quiet for a while, like, thinking about it.
'You, I hear, are going to marry my parishioner's daughter and the son of a spiritual prince of Shcherbatsky? 'He added with a smile.' 'Beautiful girl.
'Yes,' answered Levin, blushing for the priest.
"Why would he ask about it in confession?" 'He thought.'
And as if responding to his thought, the priest said to him,
'You are going to marry, and God may reward you with offspring, isn't it?
What kind of upbringing do you have for your little ones, if you do not overcome the temptation of Satan, who incites you to disbelief? 'He said, with a gentleness.' 'If you love your magic, you will be like a good father, not one wealth, luxury, and honor to your child; you will desire his salvation, his spiritual education with the light of truth.
Isn't it?
What will you say to him when an innocent little girl asks you, "Father! Who created all that pleases me in this world, earth, water, sun, flowers, grass?"
Do you say to him, "I do not know"?
You can't help but know when God has revealed this to you by His great mercy.
Or your child will ask you, "What will happen to me in the afterlife?"
What do you say to him when you don't know anything?
How will you answer him?
Give him the beauty of the world and the devil?
That's not good! 'He said, and stopped, turning his head sideways, and looking at Levin with kind, mild eyes.'
Levin did not answer anything now -- not because he did not want to engage in an argument with the priest, but because no one asked him such questions; and when his little ones asked those questions, there would still be time to think about what to answer.
'You enter the era of life,' the priest continued, 'when you must choose the path and stick to it. Pray to God that by his grace he may help you and have mercy on you,' he concluded. 'The Lord and our God Jesus Christ, the grace and bounty of his human love, may the thai chado forgive...' And, having completed the prayer of permission, the priest blessed and released him.
When Levin returned home on that day, he felt joyous that the awkward situation was over and ended up not having to lie.
Besides, he had a vague memory that what that good and sweet old man said wasn't as stupid as he thought at first, and that there was something here that needed to be understood.
'It will, not now,' thought Levin, 'but someday afterwards.'
Levin now felt more than ever that there was something in his heart that was unclear and unclean, and that he was in the same position with regard to religion that he had seen so clearly and did not love in others, and for which he blamed his friend Sviyazhsky.
While spending this evening with the bride at Dolly's, Levin was particularly entertaining and, explaining to Stepan Arkadiyich the excruciating state in which he was, said that he was having fun, like a dog who was taught to ride through a hoop and who, after finally understanding and doing what was required of her, grovels and, waving his tail, jumps with delight on tables and windows.
On the day of the wedding, Levin, in accordance with custom (the Princess and Daria Alexandrovna strictly insisted) did not see his fiancée and had lunch at his hotel with three random bachelors: Sergei Ivanovich, Katavasov, a fellow university professor, now a professor of science, whom Levin had dragged to his place on the street, and Chirikov, a best man, a Moscow world judge, a fellow bear hunter.
Lunch was very fun.
Koznyshev was in the best position of spirit and entertained the originality of Katavasov.
Katavasov, feeling that his originality was appreciated and understood, was wearing it.
Chirikov was fun and kind enough to support any conversation.
'Here,' said Katavasov, according to a habit acquired in the Chair, stretching out his words, 'what a capable little friend of ours Konstantin Dmitrich was.
I'm talking about missing people because he's gone.
And science loved then, when he left the university, and he had human interests; now one half of his ability is aimed at lying to himself, and the other half at justifying this deception.
'The more determined enemy of marriage, like you, I have not seen,' said Sergei Ivanovic.
'No, I am not the enemy. I'm a friend of the division of labour.
People who can't do anything should do things to people, and others should promote their education and happiness.
That's how I see it.
Mixing two of these crafts is the darkness of hunters, I'm not one of them.
'How happy I will be to know that you will fall in love!' said Levin. 'Please invite me to the wedding.
'I'm in love already.
'Yes, in the karate.'
You know,' Levin turned to his brother,' Michael Semenić writes an essay on nutrition and...
'Well, don't get confused!
It doesn't matter what it is.
The thing is, I really like karate.
'But she wouldn't stop you from loving your wife.
'She's not gonna hurt me, but she's gonna hurt her wife.
'Why?
'You'll see.
You love the farm, the hunting -- look at this!
'And now Archip was, saying, the elbows of Prudne and the two bears,' said Chirikov.
'Well, you'll take them without me.
'It is true,' said Koznyshev. 'And say goodbye to the bear hunt,' the wife won't let go!
The idea that his wife wouldn't let him in was so pleasant that he was willing to give up the pleasure of seeing bears forever.
'But it is a pity that these two bears will be taken without you.'
Do you remember the last time in Hapelov?
A wonderful hunt would be,' said Chirikov.
Levin didn't want to disappoint him that there might be something good anywhere without her, so he didn't say anything.
'This custom of saying goodbye to a single life has not been established for nothing,' said Koznyshev. 'Blessed as it may be, I still feel sorry for freedom.'
'Are you going to admit, is there a feeling like a Gogol fiancé that you want to jump out into the window?'
'I suppose there is, but I won't admit it! 'Katawasov said, and he wanted it loudly.'
'Well, the window is open...'
Let's go to Truth now!
One bear, you can go to the den.
Right, let's go five o'clock!
And here's what they want,' said he, smiling, Chirikov.
'Oh, my God!' said Levin smiling, 'I cannot find in my heart this feeling of regret for my freedom!
'You have such chaos in your soul that you will find nothing,' said Katavasov. 'Wait a minute, you'll find it!
'No, I'd like to feel a little bit that, apart from his feelings (he didn't want to say in front of him -- love) and happiness, I still feel sorry for losing my freedom...'
On the contrary, it's the loss of my freedom and I'm glad.
'Bad!
The hopeless unsub!' said Katavasov. 'Well, let's drink to his healing, or we'll only wish for one hundred of his dreams to come true.'
And it's gonna be as happy as it's ever been on earth!
Soon after lunch, the guests left to change in time for the wedding.
After remaining alone and remembering these bachelors' conversations, Levin once again asked himself, "Does he have in his heart this feeling of regret about his freedom that they spoke of?
He smiled at the matter.
"Liberate?
Why freedom?
Happiness is only to love and desire, to think of her desires, her thoughts, that is, no freedom -- that is happiness!"
'But do I know her thoughts, her desires, her feelings?' 'Suddenly whispered a voice to him.'
The smile disappeared from his face, and he thought.
And suddenly he had a weird feeling.
He found fear and doubt, doubt everything.
"What's wrong with her not loving me?
That how does she marry me just to get married?
What if she doesn't know what she's doing? 'He asked himself.' 'She can remember and only when she has married will she realize that she does not love and cannot love me.'
And the weirdest, worst thoughts of her started to come to him.
He was jealous of her, like a year ago, as if this evening he saw her with Vronski was yesterday.
He suspected she hadn't told him everything.
He jumped up quickly.
"No, you can't do that! 'He said to himself with despair.' 'I will go to her, ask her, for the last time, shall I say, We are free, and should we not stop?'
It is better than perdition, disgrace, and infidelity."
With despair in his heart and anger at all men, at himself, at which he left the hotel and went to her.
No one was waiting for him.
He caught her in the back rooms. She sat in a chest and had something to do with the girl, picking up a bunch of coloured dresses laid on the backs of chairs and on the floor.
'Ah! 'She cried out when she saw him, and she was filled with joy.' 'How are you, how did you (until this last day she told him "you" and "you"?'
I didn't expect it!
And I'm sorting out my girls' dresses, who's gonna...
'Ah! That's very good!" he said, looking down at the girl.
'Go away, Dunya, I will call you then,' said Kitty. 'What is wrong with you? 'She asked, strongly saying to him, 'you,' as soon as the girl came out.
She noticed his strange face, excited and sombre, and found fear of her.
'Kiti! I'm in pain.
I cannot suffer alone,' he said with despair in his voice, stopping in front of her and looking her in the eyes, beggingly.
He had already seen from her loving true face that nothing could come out of what he intended to say, but he still needed her to disbelieve him herself.
'I have come to say that time has not yet passed.
It can all be destroyed and corrected.
I don't understand anything.
What's wrong with you? 'What I've said a thousand times, and I can't help but think... that I'm not worth you.
You couldn't agree to marry me.
Think about it.
You were wrong.
Think about it.
You can't love me... if... tell me better," he said without looking at her. 'I will be unhappy.
Let everyone say what they want; it's better than misery...
It's better now. As long as there's time...
'I don't understand,' she replied in fear, 'that you want to refuse... that you don't have to?
'Yes, if you don't love me.
'You're insane! 'She cried, blushing with shame.' But his face was so pathetic that she held back her shame and, by throwing the dresses off the chair, moved closer to him.
'What do you think? Say everything.
'I think you can't love me.
Why can't you love me?
'Oh, my God! What can I do? 'She said, and cried.'
'Oh, what have I done! 'He cried, and stood before her on his knees, kissing her hands.'
When the Princess entered the room five minutes later, she found them completely at peace.
Kitty not only assured him that she loved him, but even when she answered his question why she loved him, she explained to him why.
She told him that she loved him for understanding him, for knowing that he should love him, and that everything he loved was fine.
And that seemed quite clear to him.
When the Princess came in, they sat next to her in the chest, dislodged the dresses, and argued that Kitty wanted to give Dunyasha that brown dress she was wearing when Levin proposed to her, and he insisted that this dress should not be given to anyone, but that he should give Dunyasha a blue dress.
'How can you not understand?'
She's brunette, and she's not gonna walk...
I've got it all figured out.
When she found out why he was coming, the Princess was half-funny and half-heartedly angry and sent him home to dress up and not stop Kitty from combing her hair, as Charles was about to arrive.
'She hasn't eaten anything all these days, and she's delusional, and you're still upsetting her with your stupidity,' she said to him. 'Get out, get out, sweetheart.
Levin, guilty and ashamed, but calmed, returned to his hotel.
His brother, Daria Alexandrovna and Stepan Arkadić, all in the toilet, were waiting for him to bless him in a way.
There was no time to slow down. Daria Alexandrovna would still have to come home to pick up her son, who had to carry the image of the bride.
Then one carriage had to be sent for the best man, and the other, who would drive Sergei Ivanovich, sent back...
In fact, there were a lot of complicated considerations.
There was one thing you shouldn't have done, because it's half past seven.
It didn't come out of the blessing in a way.
Stepan Arkadić became in a comic and trade position next to his wife, took the image, and commanded Levin to bow down to the ground, blessed him with a good and laughing smile, and kissed him three times; so she also made the same thing to Darya Alexandrovna, and immediately made the journey and became confused again in the plans of the carriages.
'Well, here's what we're gonna do: you're gonna follow him in our carriage, and Sergei Ivanovic would have been so kind as to stop by and send him.
'Well, I am very pleased.
'And we'll be right there with him.
The stuff's been sent? 'Stepan Arkadić said.'
'Sent,' answered Levin, and told Kuzma to dress.
A crowd of people, especially women, surrounded the wedding church.
Those who had not yet entered the middle crowded by the windows, pushing, arguing, and looking through the bars.
More than 20 carriages have already been set up by gendarmes along the street.
The police officer, ignoring the frost, stood at the entrance, shining with his uniform.
There were still crews coming, and the ladies in the flowers with their plumes up, men taking off their caps or black hat, entered the church.
In the church itself, both chandeliers and all the candles in the local images had already been lit.
The golden glow on the red background of the iconostas, and the golden thread of the icon, and the silver of the candlesticks, and the plates of the floor, and the carpets, and the ferrets at the top of the cleros, and the steps of the amvon, and the old blackened books, and the darts, and the poems, were all covered with light.
On the right side of the warm church, in a crowd of frascos and white ties, uniforms and trousers, velvet, atlas, hair, flowers, naked shoulders and hands, and high gloves, there was a discreet and lively conversation in the tall dome.
Every time the door was opened, the talk in the crowd was quiet, and everyone looked back, waiting to see the bride and groom coming in.
But the door has already been opened more than ten times, and each time it was either a late guest or a guest joining a mug of invitees to the right, or an spectator, a cheating or condescending police officer joining a crowd, to the left. And the family and the outsiders have passed through all the waiting stages.
At first, it was thought that the bride and groom would arrive immediately without giving any meaning to the lateness.
Then they looked at the door more often and more often, talking about whether anything had happened.
Then the lateness became awkward, and family and guests tried to pretend that they didn't think about the groom and were busy talking.
Protodyacon, as a reminder of the value of his time, was impatient to shake windows.
On the cliros, there was a voice sample, a snorkeling of missed singers.
The priest constantly expelled the deacon, then the deacon, to see if the groom had arrived, and he himself, in a purple raspberry and stitched belt, went out to the side door more often and more often, waiting for the groom.
Finally, one of the ladies, looking at the watch, said, "But it's weird!" 'and all the guests came to worry and began to express their surprise and displeasure loudly.
One of the best men went to see what happened.
Kitty at that time, long prepared, in a white dress, a long veil and a crown of pommerian flowers, with her mother and her sister Lvova, stood in the chamber of the Shorbatsk house and looked out the window, waiting in vain for more than half an hour to hear from her best man about the bridegroom's arrival in church.
Levin, however, was in the pantalons, but without a vest and a freckle, he went back and forth according to his number, lying constantly on the door and looking around the hallway.
But there was no sign of what he expected in the hallway, and when he returned with despair and waved his hands, he treated Stepan Arkadyich, who smoked in peace.
'Has there ever been a man in such a terrible stupid position?' 'He said.
'Yes, silly,' confirmed Stepan Arkadić with a mild smile. 'But calm down, they'll be here in a moment.'
No, of course not! - Levin spoke with moderate rabies. 'And these stupid open vests!
Impossible! 'He said, looking at the shrivelled in front of his shirt.' 'And that as things had already been taken to the railway!' he cried with despair.
'Then you'll wear mine.
'And it would have been a long time ago.'
'It is not good to be funny...'
Wait! It's gonna work out.
The point was that when Levin demanded to be dressed, Kuzma, the old servant of Levin, brought a frack, a vest, and all that was needed.
'And the shirt!' cried Levin.
'The shirt is on you,' answered Kuzma with a calm smile.
The shirts of the pure Kuzma didn't know to leave, and after having been ordered to lay everything down and take it to the Shcherbatskys, from which the young men left this evening, he did so, putting everything but the fratric couple.
The shirt, dressed in the morning, was truncheoned and impossible with open-fashioned vests. Sending to Scherbatsky was far away.
They sent me to buy a shirt. Lakey's back, it's all locked up on Sunday.
It was sent to Stepan Arkadyich, brought in a shirt; it was impossible to be wide and short.
They finally sent me to Sherbatsky to lay things down.
The groom was waiting in the church, and he, like a caged beast, walked around the room, looking into the hallway and with horror and despair, remembering what he had said to Kitty and what she could think now.
At last, Kuzma's guilty man, who had raped him, flew into a room with a shirt.
'I just caught you. 'The crowbar was picked up,' said Kuzma.
Three minutes later, without looking at the clock to prevent the wounds from being corrupted, Levin ran down the hall.
'You can't help it,' said Stepan Arkadych with a smile, hurrying for him. 'It is formed, it is formed...' I tell you.
'Here we are! 'Here he is! 'Which one? 'Aren't you younger? 'And she, Mother, is neither dead nor alive!' said in the crowd when Levin, meeting the bride at the door, entered the church with her.
Stepan Arkadić told his wife the reason for the deceleration, and the guests whispered to each other smiling.
Levin saw nothing, and saw no one: he looked not down his eyes at his fiancée.
Everyone said that she had been very foolish in these last days and was far from as good under the crown as usual; but Levin did not find it.
He looked at her tall hair with a long white voila and white flowers, at a high-skinned collar, especially the virgin who closed her long neck from the side and opened her long neck in the front, and the amazingly thin waist, and he thought that she was better than ever -- not because these flowers, this veil, this dress from Paris added something to her beauty, but because, despite that curry dress, the expression of her lovely face, her eyes, her lips were still her own special expression of innocence.
'I thought you wanted to run,' she said, and smiled at him.
'So stupid what happened to me, I am ashamed to speak! 'He said, blushing, and had to turn to Koznyshev.'
'Your shirt story is good! 'Said Sergei Ivanovic, shaking his head and smiling.
'Yes, yes,' answered Levin, without understanding what was being said.
'Well, Kostya, now it is up to you to decide,' said Stepan Arkadych, with a fake-scared view, 'is an important question. You are now in a position to appreciate his importance.
They ask me, ‘ Shall I light burning candles, or unburned candles? '
The difference of ten rubles,' he added, gathering lips in a smile. 'I've decided, but I'm afraid you won't agree.
Levin realized it was a joke, but he couldn't smile.
'So how?' Unburned or burned? Here's the question.
'Yes, yes! Unburned.
'Well, I'm very pleased. The matter is settled!' said Stepan Arkadych, smiling. 'But how foolish people are in this position,' he said to Chiricov, when Levin looked at him, confusedly, and moved toward the bride.
'Look, Kitty, get on the rug first,' said Countess Nordston, coming. 'Good for you! 'She turned to Levin.'
'What, isn't it scary? 'Maria Dmitrikina, the old aunt, said.'
'Aren't you fresh?
You're pale.
Wait, bend over!' said Sister Kitty, Lvova, and round her full beautiful hands, with a smile, fixed her hair with flowers.
Dolly came over, wanted to say something, but she couldn't speak, she cried, and she laughed unnaturally.
Kitty looked at everyone with the same missing eyes as Levin.
All she could respond to was a smile of happiness, which was now so natural for her. In the meantime, the churchmen dressed up, and the priest and deacon went out to the analah, who was standing in the act of the church.
The priest turned to Levin, saying something. Levin did not listen to what the priest said.
'Take the hand of the bride and lead,' said the best man Levin.
For a long time Levin could not understand what was required of him.
They had long corrected him and wanted to leave him, because he had taken everything by the wrong hand or by the wrong hand, when he realized, at last, that he had to take her by the right hand without changing his position.
When he finally took the bride's hand as he should have, the priest walked several steps ahead of them and stopped at the analoy.
A crowd of family and acquaintances, buzzing with talk and shrubbing with plumes, moved behind them.
Someone bent over, fixed the bride's plume.
The church was so quiet, it heard a drop of wax.
The old priest, in the hamster, with a shiny silver of gray patches of hair taken two sides behind his ears, poking little old hands out of heavy silver with a golden cross on the back of the ripple, was picking up something from the analoy.
Stepan Arkadič approached him carefully, whispered something, and winked at Levin and went back in again.
The priest lit two flowers - adorned candles, holding them side by side in his left hand, so the wax dripping slowly from them, and turned face to the bridesmaids.
The priest was the same as Levin's confession.
He looked tired and sad at the groom and the bride, sighed and, out of the heat of his right hand, blessed the groom with it, and also, with a shade of tenderness, put folded fingers on Kitty's lean head.
Then he brought them candles, and took the cadile, and turned away slowly from them.
"Is it really true?" 'I thought Levin and looked back at the bride.'
He saw her profile on the top, and by the slightly visible movement of her lips and eyelashes, he knew that she felt his eyes.
She didn't look back, but the high assembly collar moved up to her pink little ear.
He saw a sigh stopping in her chest and shaking a small hand in a tall glove, holding a candle.
All the fuss about the shirts, the lateness, the conversation with the acquaintances, the family, their displeasure, his funny position -- all of a sudden, he disappeared and became happy and scared.
A beautiful, tall protodyacone in a silver poem, with its crumbled crumbs standing on the sides, the boy went forward and, with his usual gesture on two fingers, stopped against the priest.
Blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah, blah! 'Slowly one by one, swinging the waves of the air, with solemn sounds.'
"Blessed is our God forever, now and forever and ever," answered the old man the priest humbly and singer, continuing to take something to the anal.
And when he filled the whole church from windows to roofs, he climbed thinly and wide, reinforced himself, stopped for a moment, and quietly measured the full chord of the invisible clir.
They prayed, as always, for the high peace and salvation, for the synod, for the king; they also prayed for God's servants now engaged, Konstantin and Catherine.
"Oh, send them love more perfect, more peaceful and more helpful, and pray to God," as if the whole church were breathing with the voice of a protodyacon.
Levin listened to the words, and they struck him.
"How did they know it was help, it was help? 'He thought, remembering all his recent fears and som--negative.' 'What do I know?
What can I do in this terrible matter,' he thought, 'without help?
It's the help I need now."
When the deacon finished the ectenus, the priest turned to those who were engaged to the book:
'God is eternal, parting in the union,' he read with a mild singing voice, 'and the union of love that gave them unbreakable; blessed Isaac and Rebekah, the heirs of your promise are shown: bless yourself, and your servants these, Constantin, Catherine, and I shall instruct all good works.
As a merciful and loving God, we give thee glory, to the father, and to the son, and to the holy spirit, now and forever and ever." 'Aamen,' the invisible choir spilled into the air again.
"Distinguishing in union and union of love," how thoughtful these words are and how appropriate to what you feel at this moment! 'I thought Levin.' 'Does she feel like me?'
And when he looked back, he met her eyes.
And by the expression of that look, he concluded that she understood what he understood.
But that was not true; she could hardly understand the words of the service or even listen to them during the engagement.
She could not listen and understand them: so much was the feeling that filled her soul and became more and more intense.
It was a joy to complete what had already been in her soul for a month and a half and that, during all those six weeks, she had been joyful and tormented.
In her soul on the day that she, in her brown dress in the hall of Arbat's house, came to him silently and gave herself to him, in her soul on that day and hour a complete break with the rest of her life was made, and a whole new, completely unknown life began, but in reality the old life continued.
These six weeks were the happiest and most painful time for her.
Her whole life, all her desires, all her hopes, were focused on one other person she could not understand, with whom she was associated by something even more incomprehensible than the man himself, a close and repulsive feeling, but she continued to live in the old life.
As she lived her old life, she was terrified of herself, of her total irresistible indifference to all her past — to things, to habits, to people who loved her, to people who loved her, to the grief of her mother's indifference, to the sweet, above all, to the beloved tender father.
She was apprehensive of that indifference, she rejoiced at what led her to that indifference.
She could neither think nor wish for anything beyond her life with this man; but this new life has not yet existed, and she could not even imagine it clearly.
There was one expectation: the fear and joy of the new and unknown. And now it's about to end, and the uncertainty, and the remorse of the previous life -- it's gonna be over, and it's gonna start new.
The new one could not but be scary because of its unknowns; but it was scary or not scary -- it had already taken place six weeks ago in her soul; now only what had long been done in her soul had been consecrated.
When he turned again to the analah, the priest found it difficult to catch Kitty's little ring and, after demanding Levin's hand, put it on the first joint of his finger.
"The slave of God Konstantin is engaged to God's servant Yekaterina." And when he put a large ring on a pink, small, pitiful finger of Kitty, the priest said the same thing.
On several occasions, the betrothed wanted to know what to do, and each time they were wrong, the priest whispered to correct them.
Finally, when he had done what he had to do when he had crossed them with rings, he again gave Kitty a big one, and Levin a small one; again, they confused themselves and handed the ring from hand to hand twice, and yet it did not come out as required.
Dolly, Chirikov and Stepan Arkadić went forward to correct them.
There was confusion, whispering, and smiles, but the solemn and condescending expression on the faces of the betrothed did not change; on the contrary, they looked with their hands more serious and solemn than ever before, and a smile with which Stepan Arkadych whispered, that everyone now put on his ring, and suddenly froze on his lips.
He felt that every smile would insult them.
'You meant that you created a male and a female,' the priest read after the change of the rings, 'the wife is joined by you, to help and in the perception of the human race.
O God our God, who has sent the truth to your inheritance and your promise, to your servants our fathers, in which is your lineage and your lineage, and has been chosen, and have seen your servant Konstantin and your servant Catherine, and have established their betrothal in faith, and in common thoughts, and in truth, and in love..."
Levin felt more and more that all his thoughts about getting married, his dreams about how he would live his life -- that it was all childish and that it was something he had not yet understood and now even less understood, even though it was being done over him; in his breasts all tremors were raised above and above, and unruly tears appeared to him.
The church was full of Moscow, family and acquaintances.
And during the engagement ceremony, in the shiny lighting of the church, in a circle of empty women, girls, and men in white ties, fractures and uniforms, there was a decent and quiet talk that men had mostly been plotting, while women were caught up in the observation of all the details so always touching their sacred activities.
Her two sisters were in a mug closest to the bride, Dolly and Lvova's older, calm, beautiful woman who came from abroad.
'What is Marie in the purple, exactly black, at the wedding?' 'Corsunsky said.'
'With the light of her face is one salvation...' answered Drubeckka. 'I wonder why they made the wedding tonight.' It's a merchant...
'Beautiful.
I too was married tonight,' answered Korsunsky and sighed, remembering how cute she was on that day, how funny her husband was in love and how everything else was now.
'It is said that whoever is the best man more than ten times does not marry; I wanted the tenth to be insuring myself, but the seat was occupied,' said Count Shinyan to the pretty Princess of Charma, who had views for him.
Charska only gave him a smile.
She looked at Kitty, thinking about how and when she would stand with Count Cinjavin in Kitty's position and how she would remind him of his current joke.
Scherbatsky told the old lady Nikolaeva that he intended to wear a crown on Shinyon Kitty to make her happy.
'You shouldn't have worn the shiny one,' replied Nikolayev, who had long decided that if the old widower she had caught married her, the wedding would be the easiest. 'I don't like this fast.'
Koznyshev spoke to Daria Dmitrievna, kidding her that the custom of leaving after the wedding spreads because newlyweds are always somewhat ashamed.
'Your brother can be proud.
She's lovely.
I think you're jealous?
'I have already been through this, Daria Dmitriyana,' he replied, and his face suddenly took a sad and serious look.
Stepan Arkadić told his sister-in-law about the divorce.
'It is necessary to correct the wreath,' she answered, without listening to it.
'It is a pity that she was so silly,' said Countess Nordston Lvova. 'And yet he does not stand her finger.'
Isn't that right?
'No, I like him very much. Not because he's the future beaufrere, Lvov answered. 'And how good he is!
And it's so hard to keep yourself in this position -- not be funny. And he's not funny, he's not tight, he can see he's touched.
'I think you've been waiting for this?
'Almost.
She always loved him.
'Well, let's see which one of them will first be on the carpet.
I advised Kitty.
'It's all the same,' Lvova replied, 'we are all obedient wives, it's in our breed.
'And I was so deliberately the first to be with Vasily.
And you, Dolly?
Dolly stood beside them, heard them, but did not answer. She was moved.
Tears were in her eyes, and she couldn't say anything without crying.
She rejoiced at Kitty and Levin; when she returned to her wedding, she looked at the shining Stepan Arkadyić, forgetting all the real things, and remembered only her first innocent love.
She remembered not only herself, but all the women who were close to her and knew her; she remembered them at the one solemn time when they, like Kitty, stood under the crown with love, hope and fear in the heart, disavowing the past and entering a mysterious future. Among those brides who came to her memory, she also remembered her lovely Anna, whose alleged divorce she had recently heard.
And she was also, clean, standing in pommeran flowers and veils.
Now what? 'Awfully strange,' she said.
Sisters, friends, and family members were not the only ones who followed all the details of the sacred work; foreign women, spectators, with excitement, breathtaking, watched, fearing the loss of every movement, the expression of the bride and groom's face, and with displeasure, did not answer, and often did not hear, the words of indifferent men who made joke or outside remarks.
'Why are you crying?'
Or is it going mad?
'Why are you so angry with such a good man?'
Is it the Prince?
'Is this the sister in the white atlas?'
Well, listen to the deacon screaming, "Let's be afraid of his husband."
'Wordly?'
'Synodical.
'I asked the footman.
He says he's on his way to his place right now.
He's rich in passion, they say.
Then they gave it away.
'No, the couple are good.
'But you argued, Maria Vosaevna, that the carnalins were on their way out.
Look at that one in the dog, the messenger, talking about the rebound...
Okay, here we go again.
'Here's a lovely bride, like a sheep removed!
Whatever you say, it's pathetic for our sister.
It was said in a crowd of spectators who had sneaked through the church door.
When the betrothal ended, the churchman posted a piece of pink silk cloth in the middle of the church in front of the analoid, and the choir sang with a crafty and complex hymn in which the bass and the tenor spoke to each other, and the priest turned around and pointed to the betrothed pink piece of fabric.
As often and as much as both heard about the fact that the first person to step on the rug would be the head of the family, neither Levin nor Kitty could remember it when they took these few steps. Nor have they heard loud remarks and arguments that some have observed that it has become, in the view of others, both before.
After the usual questions about wanting to marry them and whether they promised to others, a new service began for them, strangely for those who answered themselves.
Kitty listened to the words of prayer, wanting to understand their meaning, but she couldn't.
The sense of celebration and joy as the ritual was performed was becoming more and more full of her soul and deprived her of her ability to pay attention.
They prayed "for their chastity and the fruit of the womb for the benefit of their children and daughters, and for their joy in the sight of their sons and daughters."
It was mentioned that God had created a wife out of Adam's rib, and "for the sake of his father and mother, and he will stick to his wife, there will be two in the flesh of one," and that "the secret is great to eat"; asked that God give them fertility and blessing, like Isaac and Rebekah, Joseph, Moses and Sepphorus, and that they should see the sons of their sons.
'All this was wonderful,' thought Kitty, listening to those words, 'it can never be otherwise,' and a smile of joy, unwillful to all who looked at her, shone on her bright face.
'Put it all on! 'Heard the advice when the priest put the crowns and Shcherbatsky on them, shaking with his hand in a three-pound glove, holding the crown above her head.'
'Put it on!' she whispered smiling.
Levin looked back at her and was struck by the joyous radiance on her face; and it came to him involuntarily.
He's as bright and funny as she is.
They had fun listening to the Apostolic message and the roll of protodyacon's voice at the last verse, expected so eagerly by outsiders.
It was fun to drink from a flat cup a warm red wine with water, and it became even more fun when the priest, when he had cast out the risu and took them both into his own hand, led them in the gusts of the bass that brought out the "Isaiah of the Lycue" around the analoy.
Scherbatsky and Chirikov, who supported the crowns, mixed up in the bride's plume, also smiled and rejoiced at something, fell behind, and stumbled upon the weddings at the priest's stops.
The spark of joy lit up in Kitty seemed to have been communicated to all the former members of the church.
Levin felt that both the priest and the deacon, like him, wanted to smile.
After removing the crowns from their heads, the priest read the last prayer and congratulated the young.
Levin looked at Kitty, and he never saw her like this. She was adorable with the new radiance that was on her face.
Levin wanted to tell her something, but he didn't know if it was over.
The priest got him out of trouble. He smiled with his good mouth and quietly said, 'Kiss your wife, and you kiss your husband,' and he took from their hands a candle.
Levin kissed with caution her smiling lips, gave her his hand, and, feeling a new, strange intimacy, left the church.
He didn't believe it, he couldn't believe it was true. Only when they met their surprised and shy views did he believe it because he felt that they had already been alone.
After dinner the same night, the young went to the village.
He and Anna have already traveled together in Europe for three months.
They traveled around Venice, Rome, Naples, and just arrived in a small Italian town where they wanted to settle for a while.
A handsome ober-kelner with a neck-drop in thick hair, in a frack and with a large white batty breast shirt, with a bundle of keys over a rounded abdomen, put his hands in his pockets, sniffed with contempt, and responded strictly to something stopped by the gentleman.
Upon hearing from the other side of the entrance, the steps that had climbed up the stairs turned around and saw the Russian Count occupying their best rooms, respectfully took his hands out of his pockets and, bent down, explained that the courier had been there and that the case against the palazzo had taken place.
The chief manager is prepared to sign the condition.
'Ah! I am very pleased,' said Vronsky. 'Is the lady at home or not?
'They went out for a walk, but now they are back,' answered Kelner.
He removed from his head a soft hat with large fields and covered his handkerchief with a sweaty forehead and a hair that had been loosed up to half his ears, scratched back and covered his baldness.
And when he looked at the gentleman standing and looking at him, he wanted to pass.
'The gentleman of this Russian asked about you,' said the Ober-keller.
With a mixed sense of displeasure that you would not go away from your acquaintances, and a desire to find any distraction from the uniformity of your life, Wronsky once again looked back at the departed and stopped master; and at the same time, both had their eyes brightened.
'Golenishchev!
'Vronsky!
Indeed, it was Golenishchev, comrade of Vronski's Paže Corps.
Golenishchev in the corps belonged to a liberal party, came out of the corps with a civilian chin and never served anywhere.
The comrades were completely separated on the way out of the building and met only once.
At that meeting, he realized that Golenishchev had chosen some highly intelligent liberal activity and, as a result, he wanted to despise the activities and the title of Vronsky.
That's why, when he met Golenishchev, he gave him the cold and proud fight he could give to people, the meaning of which was, "You may or may not like my way of life, but I don't care: you have to respect me if you want to know me."
Golenishchev was contemptiblely indifferent to the tone of Vronsky. This meeting would seem to have further divided them.
Now they shined and cried out with joy when they came to know one another.
He wasn't expecting to be so happy with Golenishchev, but he probably didn't know how bored he was.
He forgot the unpleasant impression of the last meeting and, with an open, joyful face, extended his hand to his former companion.
The same expression of joy replaced the previous disturbing expression of Golenishchev's face.
'How glad I am to meet you! 'Vronsky said, making a friendly smile of his strong white teeth.
'And I hear him, when he hears him, and he hears him, but he -- he didn't know.'
Very, very happy!
'Come in.
Well, what are you doing?
'I have lived here for the second year.
I'm working.
'Ah! 'Observatoryly, he said.' 'Come in.
And by the usual habit of the Russians, instead of saying what he wanted to hide from his servants in Russian, he spoke French.
'Do you know Karenina?
We travel together.
I am going to her,' he said in French, looking carefully in the face of Golenishchev.
'Ah!
I didn't know (although he knew)," Golenishchev answered with indifference. 'How long have you been here?' 'He added.'
He answered on the fourth day, looking at his friend's face again.
"Yeah, he's a decent man and he looks at the case as he should," he said to himself, understanding the meaning of Golenishchev's face and changing the conversation. 'You can introduce him to Anna, he sees how he should be.'
In these three months he spent with Anna abroad, with new people, he always wondered how this new face would look at his relationship with Anna, and he saw most of the understanding in men.
But if he were asked and asked of those who understood "how to do," what was that understanding, he and they would be in great difficulty.
As a matter of fact, those who understood "as they should" did not understand it at all, but kept themselves at all how well-educated people behaved about all the difficult and unsolvable issues on all sides of life around them -- kept themselves decent, avoiding insinuations and unpleasant questions.
They pretended to understand the meaning and meaning of the provision, to recognize it and even to approve it, but found it inappropriate and unnecessary to explain it all.
He immediately realized that Golenishchev was one of them, and therefore he was twice as happy with him. Indeed, Golenishchev kept himself with Karenina when he was introduced to her, as only he could have wished.
He apparently avoided any conversation that might lead to awkwardness without the slightest effort.
He did not know Anna before, and was struck by her beauty and even more simpleness, with which she accepted her position.
She blushed when he introduced Golenishchev, and this child's paint, which covered her open and beautiful face, was extremely fond of him.
But he especially liked the fact that she was immediately, as if on purpose, so that there could be no misunderstanding in a stranger's life, that she just called Wronski Alexei and said that they were moving with him to a newly hired house called the palazzo here.
Golenishchev enjoyed this direct and simple attitude toward his position.
Looking at Anna's good-natured and entertaining energy - style, knowing Alexey Alexandrovich and Wronski, Golenishchev seemed to understand her quite well.
He felt that he understood what she did not understand — just how she could, by causing her husband's misery, leaving him and his son, and losing the good glory, feel energy, joy, and happiness.
'He is in the guide,' said Golenishchev, about the palazzo who hired Vronski. 'There's a beautiful Tintoretto there.
From his last era.
'You know what? The weather is beautiful, let's go there again, let's have a look at it,' he said, turning to Anna.
'I'm very glad I'm going to wear a hat.'
Are you saying it's hot? 'She said, stopping by the door, and looking at Vronsky in question.' And once again, the bright paint covered her face.
He understood from her view that she did not know what relationship he wanted with Golenishchev and that she was afraid that she would behave as he would.
He looked at her with a tender, long look.
'No, not very,' he said.
And it seemed to her that she understood, most important of all, that he was pleased with her; and when she smiled at him, she walked out the door quickly.
The pals looked at each other, and there was confusion in both faces, as if Golenishchev, who apparently loved her, wanted something--say anything about her and find what, and he wanted and feared the same thing.
'That's how,' he began to start some conversation. 'So you settled here?
So you're still doing the same thing? 'He continued, remembering that he had been told that Golenishchev had written something...'
'Yes, I am writing the second part of "The Two Started," said Golenishchev with pleasure in this matter, 'that is, to be precise, I am not writing yet, but I am preparing, I am collecting materials.
It's gonna be much bigger and it's gonna take up almost all the questions.
We in Russia do not want to understand that we are the heirs of Byzantium,' he began a long, hot explanation.
It was awkward at first for him not to know the first article about the "Two Beginnings" that the author had mentioned as something known.
But then, when Golenishchev began to express his thoughts and he could have followed him, even though he did not know "The Two began," he listened to him with interest because Golenishchev spoke well.
However, he was surprised and grieved by the irritation with which Golenishchev spoke about his subject.
The further he spoke, the more his eyes lit up, the more hasty he objected to his perceived opponents and the more disturbing and insulted his face became.
After remembering Golenishchev as a skinny, living, good-natured and noble boy, always the first student in the corps, he could not understand the reasons for this irritation and did not approve it.
In particular, he didn't like the fact that Golenishchev, a man of a good circle, was getting on the same board with some writers who annoyed him, and he was angry with them.
Was it worth it?
He didn't like it, but even though he felt that Golenishchev was unhappy, he felt sorry for him.
Disadvantage, almost insanity, was seen in this moving, rather beautiful face, while he continued to express his thoughts in haste and heat, without even notice of Anna's exit.
When Anna came out wearing a hat and a cape and quickly moved her beautiful arm with an umbrella, he stopped by him, and with relief he fell away from the glamorous eyes of Golenishchev, and with new love looked at his lovely, full of life and joy to his friend.
Golenishchev was hard to remember, and at first he was despondent and dark, but Anna, who was fond of everything (which time it was), soon refreshed him with her simple and merry treatment.
After trying different subjects, she drew him into paintings, about which he spoke very well, and listened carefully to him.
They walked to the hired house and examined it.
'I am very happy to be alone,' said Anna Golenishchev, when they had already returned. 'Alexei will have a good attelier.
"Of course you will take this room," she said, in Russian, and you told him, because she had already realized that Golenishchev in their privacy would become a close man and that there was no need to hide in front of him.
'Do you write? 'O Golenishchev said, turning quickly to Vronsky.'
'Yes, I've been studying for a long time and now I've started a little,' he said, blushing.
'He has a great talent,' said Anna with a happy smile. 'I am certainly not a judge!
But the judges said the same thing.
In this first period of her release and rapid recovery, Anna felt unforgivably happy and full of joy.
The memory of her husband's misery did not poison her happiness.
The memory, on the one hand, was too terrible to think of. On the other hand, her husband's distress gave her too much happiness to repent.
Memories of everything that happened to her after her illness: reconciliation with her husband, breakup, news of the wound, his appearance, preparation for divorce, departure from her husband &apos; s house, goodbye to her son -- all seemed to her to be a hot dream, from which she woke up alone with Wronski abroad.
The memory of her husband's evil caused her a feeling of disgust and similar to that of a drowning person who ripped away a man from himself.
The man drowned. Of course, it was bad, but it was the only rescue, and it's better not to think about those scary details.
One sedative discussion of what she had done came to her at the first minute of the breakup, and when she remembered the past, she remembered that reasoning.
'I have inevitably done this man's misery,' she thought, 'but I do not want to take advantage of it; nor do I suffer and will I suffer: I am losing what I treasured most,' I am losing my honest name and son.
I have done wrong, so I do not want happiness, I do not want divorce, and I will suffer shame and separation from my son."
But as much as Anna sincerely wanted to suffer, she did not suffer.
There was no shame.
With so many tactics, they went abroad, avoiding Russian women, never put themselves in a false position, and met people everywhere who pretended to understand their mutual position much better than they themselves understood it.
The separation from the son she loved, and she didn't torment her the first time.
The girl, his child, has been so sweet and so attached to Anna since she was left with this one girl, which Anna rarely remembered about her son.
The need for life, increased by recovery, was so strong and the living conditions were so new and pleasant that Anna felt unforgivably happy.
The more she got to know him, the more she loved him.
She loved him for himself and for his love for her.
Full possession of it was a constant joy to her.
Her closeness to him has always been pleasant.
All the features of his personality that she learned more and more were incredibly sweet to her.
His appearance, changed in plain clothes, was attractive to her as a young lover.
In everything he said, thought and did, she saw something especially noble and lofty.
Her admiration for him often frightened her; she searched for and could not find anything unbelievable in him.
She did not dare to show him the consciousness of her wretchedness in front of him.
She felt that, knowing this, he might not love her much more; and she was not so afraid of anything now, even though she had no reason to lose his love.
But she couldn't help but thank him for his attitude toward her and show her how much she appreciated it.
He, in her view, had such a certain calling for State action, in which he should have played a prominent role -- he sacrificed his ambition for her, never showing the slightest regret.
He was more than ever in love with her, and the thought that she would never feel embarrassed about her situation would never leave him for a moment.
He, such a courageous man, was not only not in conflict with her, but had no will, and seemed to be only busy warning her wishes.
And she could not help but appreciate it, even though it was the most tense of his attention to her, this atmosphere of concern that he had surrounded her, sometimes burdened her.
In the meantime, despite the full realization of what he wanted for so long, he was not entirely happy.
He soon felt that the fulfilment of his desire had brought him only a grain of sand from the mountain of happiness he had expected.
This implementation showed him the eternal error that humans make in realizing happiness in the pursuit of desire.
First, after joining her and wearing a civilian dress, he felt the beauty of freedom at all, which he had never known before, and freedom of love, and was pleased, but not for long.
He soon felt the desire, the sadness, in his soul.
Regardless of his will, he began to grasp every passing whim, taking it as a desire and a goal.
Sixteen hours of the day had to be occupied because they lived abroad in perfect freedom, outside the public life cycle that took place in Petersburg.
It was not possible to think of the pleasures of a single life that had taken place abroad in the past, since one attempt of that kind had produced an unexpected and inappropriate late dinner with friends in Anna.
It was impossible to have social relations with local and Russians, if their situation was uncertain.
The sighting of the sights, not to mention what was already visible, did not have for him, as for a Russian and a smart man, the unexplained significance that the English can attribute to this case.
And just as the hungry animal grabbed all the things that were caught, hoping to find food in it, and when he was completely unconscious, he grabbed the politics, the new books, and the paintings.
Since he had the ability to paint, and because he, without knowing where to spend his money, started collecting engravings, he stopped at painting, took up painting, and placed in it that unoccupied stock of desires that required satisfaction.
He had the ability to understand art and true, with the taste to imitate art, and he thought that he had what he needed for an artist, and, having hesitated for some time what kind of painting he would choose: religious, historical or realistic, he began to write.
He understood all the births and could be inspired by both; but he could not imagine not knowing at all what the birth of painting was, nor could he be inspired directly by what was in the soul, without caring whether what he would write would be of any known kind.
Since he did not know this and was inspired not directly by life, but indirectly by life already embodied in art, he was inspired very quickly and easily and as quickly and easily achieved that what he wrote was very similar to the kind he wanted to imitate.
More than anything else, he liked French, graceful, and glamorous, and in that way he began to paint Anna's portrait in an Italian suit, and it seemed to him and everyone who saw him to be very successful.
An old, launched palazzo with high-blind plateaus and frescoes on the walls, with puzzle floors, with heavy yellow trousers on high windows, vases on consoles and fireplaces, with sliced doors and dark halls of paintings -- this palazzo, after moving into it, by his own appearance, maintained a pleasant delusion in Vronsk that he was not so much a Russian landowner, an egermeister without service as an enlightened amateur and patron of the arts, and himself a modest artist who had abandoned light, connections, love for the woman he loved.
The role chosen by Wronski in moving to Palazzo was entirely successful, and after meeting some interesting people through Golenishchev, he was calm at first.
He wrote under the leadership of an Italian professor of painting from nature and was engaged in medieval Italian life.
Middle-century Italian life has lately been so flattered by Vronski that he even had a hat and a blanket over his shoulder to wear in the middle of the century, which was very close to him.
'And we live, and we know nothing,' said he, who came to them in the morning, Golenishchev. 'Have you seen the Michailov painting?' 'He said, giving him a Russian newspaper just received this morning, and pointing to an article about a Russian artist living in the same city who had finished a painting that had long been rumored and had been bought in advance.
The article challenged the Government and the Academy for denying a wonderful artist any encouragement or assistance.
'I have seen it,' answered Golenishchev. 'Of course, he is not without a gift, but a totally false direction.
Still the same Ivanian-Straussian-Renan attitude toward Christ and religious painting.
'What does the painting represent?' 'Anna asked.'
'The Christ before Pilate.
Christ is represented by a Jew with all the realism of the new school.
And, as to the content of the painting, drawn to one of his favorite themes, Golenishem began to say:
'I don't understand how they can be so rudely mistaken.'
Christ already has a certain expression in the art of the great old. So if they want to pretend to be a revolutionary or a wise man instead of a god, let them take Socrates, Franklin, Charlotte Cordé, but not Christ.
They take the same face they can't take for art, and then...
'What, is it true that this Michailov is in such poverty?' 'Wronski asked, thinking that he, like a Russian mecenata, would have to help an artist, no matter whether he was good or bad.
'I don't think so.
He's a great portrait player.
Did you see his portrait of Vasylczykova?
But he doesn't seem to want to write portraits anymore, so maybe he's in need.
I'm saying that...
'Can't he be asked to make a portrait of Anna Arkadievna? 'Vronsky said.'
'What's mine for? - told Anna. 'I don't want any portrait after yours.
Better than Annie. That's what she called her girl.
Here she is,' she added, looking out the window at the beautiful Italian nurse who took the child to the garden, and immediately without being noticed, looking back.
The beauty of the nurse with whom he wrote his head for his painting was the only secret grief in Anna's life.
While he wrote from her, he admired her beauty and medievalness, and Anna dared not confess that she was afraid to be jealous of that nurse, so she especially caressed and spoiled both her and her little son.
He also looked out the window and into Anna's eyes, and immediately turned to Golenishchev, and said,
'Do you know Mikhaylov's ego?
'I've met him.
But he's a weirdo without any education.
You know, one of those wild new people who now meet a lot; you know, of those free-thinking people who d'emblee is raised in the concepts of infidelity, denial, and materialism.
Before it happened,' said Golenishchev, unaware of or unwilling to note that both Anna and Vronski wanted to speak, &quot; there used to be a free-thinking man who was raised in the concepts of religion, law, morality, and struggle itself, and labor; but now there is a new type of self-inflicted free-thinker who grow up without even hearing that there were laws of morality, religions, that there was authority, and that there was a direct rise in the notion of denial of everything, that is, wild.
That's what he is.
He's a son, I think, of the Moscow Lacey Camera, and he didn't get any education.
When he joined the Academy and made himself a reputation, he wanted to form himself like a fool.
And he turned to what he thought was a source of education -- magazines.
And you see, in the old days, the man who wanted to be formed, let's put the French, would have studied all the classics, the scholars, the tragedies, the historians, the philosophers, and, you know, all the work of intelligence that would have preceded him.
But now we've got him right on the negative literature, and he's got the whole science extract very quickly negative, and he's ready.
Not only that: twenty years ago, he would have found in this literature signs of a struggle against authority, against centuries-old beliefs, he would have understood from this struggle that something else was going on; but now he's directly caught up in something that doesn't even have old views to argue with, but they say, nothing, evolution, selection, struggle for existence -- that's all.
I'm in my article...
'You know what,' said Anna, a long time ago careful to look at the Vronsky, who knew that Vronski was not interested in the education of the artist, but merely in helping him and ordering him a portrait. 'You know what? 'She strongly interrupted Golenishchev's conversation. 'Let's go to him!
Golenishchev remembered and willingly agreed. But since the artist lived in the long block, they decided to take a stroller.
An hour later, Anna, near Golenishchev and at the front, at the front of the wheelchair, drove up to a beautiful new house in the long block.
When they learned from the wife of the janitor who came to them that Mikhaylov was let into his studio, but that he was now in his apartment two feet away, they sent her to him with their cards, asking for permission to see his paintings.
Michaelov's artist, as always, was at work when he was given the cards of Count Wronski and Golenishchev.
He worked in the studio this morning on a big painting.
When he came to his house, he was angry with his wife for not being able to deal with the mistress who demanded the money.
'Two dozen times I told you, do not enter into the explanation.
You're an idiot, and you're gonna start explaining in Italian, and you're gonna go out with a triple idiot,' he said to her after a long argument.
'So don't run it, it's not my fault.
If I had money...
'Leave me alone, for God's sake! 'I cried with tears in the voice of the Michaels, and shut his ears and went to his working room behind the partition and locked the door behind me.'
"Lowered!" 'He said to himself, sat down at the table, and, when he opened the folder, immediately began the drawing with special heat.
He never worked as hard and successful as he did when his life was bad, especially when he was fighting with his wife.
"Oh! I wish I hadn't gone anywhere!" 'I thought he was still working.'
He made a drawing for the figure of a man in a fit of anger.
The drawing was made before; but he was displeased with it.
"No, he was better...
Where is he?"
He went to his wife and, drowned, without looking at her, asked the older girl where the paper he had given them.
A paper with an abandoned sketch was found, but it was soiled and buried with Stearin.
After all, he took the drawing, put it on his desk, and looked away and gazed at it.
Suddenly, he smiled and shoved his hands in joy.
'Well, well!' he said, and immediately, taking a pencil, began drawing quickly.
A stain of stearina gave a man a new pose.
He was drawing this new pose, and I suddenly remembered him with an outstanding chin, the energyy face of the merchant he took the cigars from, and he's a sa-- my face, this chin painted to a man.
He laughed with joy. The figure suddenly came from a dead, made-up, alive and something that couldn't be changed.
The figure lived and was clearly and unequivocally defined.
You could adjust the drawing to the requirements of this figure, you could and should have even set your legs differently, completely changed the position of your left arm, and you could have your hair back.
But when he made these corrections, he didn't change the figures, but he just threw away what was hiding the figure.
It was as if he had removed from it the veils that did not make it all visible; every new feature was only more visible to the whole figure in all its energy power, as it appeared to him suddenly from a stear stain produced by it.
He carefully finished the figure when the cards were brought to him.
'Now, now!
He went to see his wife.
'A lot, Sasha, don't be angry!' he said to her with a gentle smile. 'It was your fault. It was my fault.
I'll take care of it. 'And when he made peace with his wife, he put on an olive with a velvet collar coat and a hat, and went to the studio.
The successful figure was already forgotten by him.
Now he was excited and excited to see his studio by these important Russians who came in a wheelchair.
About his painting, the one that was now on his mobile, he had one judgment deep down -- that no one had ever written a picture like that.
He didn't think his painting was better than everyone else in Raphaelev, but he knew that what he wanted to convey and convey in this painting was never handed over.
He knew it firmly and knew it a long time ago, since he began writing it; but the judgment of the people, whatever they were, was still of great importance to him and deeply concerned him.
Every remark, the slightest one, showing that the judges saw even a small part of what he saw in the painting, was deeply disturbing to him.
He has always attributed to his judges the depth of understanding beyond what he himself had, and has always expected something from them that he himself did not see in his painting. And often in the audience's judgment, he thought he'd found it.
He walked quickly to his studio door, and despite his excitement, the soft lighting of Anna's figure, standing in the shadow of the approach, listening to the hot Golenishchev saying something to her, and at the same time apparently wanting to look around a suitable artist, struck him.
He himself did not notice how he came to them and grabbed and swallowed that impression, as did the chin of the merchant who sold the cigars, and hid it somewhere where he would take it out when he needed it.
Visitors who were already disappointed with Golenishchev's story about the artist were even more disappointed with his appearance.
The average height, dense, spinning walk, Michailov, in his brown hat, olive coat, and tight pants, while long ago they wore a broad, particularly their common face and a combination of the expression of shyness and the desire to live up to their dignity, was unconscionable.
'I beseech you,' he said, trying to look indifferent, and when he entered into the hay, he took out the key from his pocket and opened the door.
When he entered the studio, Michaelov again looked at the guests and noted in his imagination the expression of the face, especially his cheekbone.
Although his artistic sense continued to work, collecting material, despite the fact that he felt more and more excited that a minute of judgement was approaching about his work, he quickly and thinly made up his mind about the three individuals.
The one (Gollenishchev) was Russian here.
Michaelov didn't remember his last name or where he met him or what he talked to. He only remembered his face, as he remembered all the faces he'd ever seen, but he also remembered that it was one of the people who had been placed in his imagination in a huge department of false and poor expression.
The big hair and the very open forehead gave an external significance to a person who had one small child's troubled expression focusing on a narrow Transporter.
For Michailov's sake, the good and rich Russians were supposed to be ignorant of art, just like all rich Russians but pretending to be amateurs and admirers.
"Of course, they've already looked at the whole old thing and now the studios of the new ones are coming, the charlatan of the German and the fool of the pre-raphaelite of the Englishman, and I've only come to see the fullness of the sight," he thought.
He knew very well the manner of amateurs (the smarter they were, the worse) to examine the studios of modern artists only in order to have the right to say that art had fallen and that the more you look at new ones, the more you see how the great ancient masters remain incredible.
He waited for all of this, saw it in their faces, saw it in the insensitive negligence with which they spoke to each other, looked at the mannequins and the busts, and walked freely, waiting for him to open the painting.
But, despite this, while he was turning over his lines, lifting the curtains, and filming the sheet, he felt a lot of excitement, and the more so that, despite the fact that all the nobles and rich Russians were supposed to be cattle and fools in his concept, he liked him and, in particular, Anna.
'Here, would you like that?' 'He said, pivoting to the side and pointing to the painting. 'This is Pilate's admonition.
Matthew Chapter XXVII,' he said, feeling his lips shaking with excitement. He stood back and stood behind them.
In the few seconds during which visitors were silently staring at the painting, Michaelov also looked at it, and looked at it with an uneasy, outside eye.
In these few seconds, he believed ahead that the highest, most fair trial would be pronounced by them, by those visitors he so despised a minute ago.
He forgot all that he had thought of his painting before, in the three years that he wrote it; he forgot all the virtues that were certain to him; he saw the painting of them with a indifferent, foreign, new look, and saw nothing good in it.
On the first hand, he saw Pilate's disgruntled face and the calm face of Christ and on the second hand the figures of Pilate's servants, looking at what was happening, John's face.
Every person, with such a search, with such mistakes, with such corrections, who grew up in it with her special character, every person who brought him so much suffering and joy, and all those persons who have been moved so many times to observe the common ground, all the shades of color and tone so hard achieved by him -- all these things together now, looking at them with their eyes, seemed to him vile, a thousand times repeated.
His most precious face, the face of Christ, the centerpiece of the painting, which gave him such enthusiasm at his discovery, was all lost to him when he looked at the painting with their eyes.
He saw well written (and not even good -- he now clearly saw a bunch of faults) the repetition of those endless Christ Titian, Rafael, Rubens, and the same warriors and Pilate.
All of this went away, poor and old, and even poorly written -- pestro and weak.
They'll be right to say pretentious phrases in front of the artist and feel sorry for him and laugh at him when they're alone.
The silence became too difficult for him (although it did not last more than a minute).
To interrupt him and show that he wasn't excited, he made an effort to turn to Golenishchev.
'I seem to have had the pleasure of meeting,' he said to him, anxiously looking back at Anna, and at Vronski, to avoid any aspect of their faces.
'Oh, yes! We met at Rossi's, remember, this evening where this Italian young lady, the new Rachel, spoke freely, without the slightest regret, looking away from the painting and addressing the artist.
Observing, however, that Michaelov was awaiting judgment about the painting, he said:
'Your painting has moved very much since I last saw it. And both then and now, I am incredibly struck by the figure Pilate.
That's how you understand this man, a kind, nice little man, but an official down to the bottom of his soul who doesn't know what he's doing.
But I think...
All of Mikhaylov's mobile face suddenly brightened, his eyes lit up.
He wanted to say something, but he couldn't talk out of the excitement and pretended to cough up.
No matter how low he appreciated the ability to understand the art of Golenishchev, the just remark about the fidelity of Pilate's face as an official would be offensive to him if he did not mention the most important one, Michaelov was impressed by that comment.
He himself thought of Pilate's figure the same thing that Golenishchev said.
The fact that this consideration was one of the millions of other considerations that Michaelov firmly knew would all be true would not diminish the significance of Golenishchev's comment to him.
He fell in love with Golenishchev for that remark, and from a state of displeasure he suddenly became thrilled.
At once, his whole picture came to life before him, with all the untold complexity of all living things.
Michaelov once again tried to say that he understood Pilate so; but his lips were unruly shaking, and he could not speak.
The same thing was said by the quiet voice that, in part, did not insult the artist, in part, so as not to say loudly stupidity, which is so easy to say when talking about art, is usually spoken at art exhibitions.
Mikhaylov thought the painting was impressed with them, too. He approached them.
'What an amazing expression of Christ! 'Anna said.
Of all the things she saw, she liked that expression the most, and she felt that it was the center of the painting, and that's why it would please the artist. 'It appears that he feels sorry for Pilate.
Once again, it was one of the million faithful considerations that could be found in his painting and in the figure of Christ.
She said he felt sorry for Pilate.
There must also be an expression of pity in Christ's expression, for it contains an expression of love, an unearthly calm, a willingness to die, and a consciousness of the vanity of words.
Of course, there is the expression of an official in Pilate and pity in Christ, because one personification of carnal life and the other of spiritual life.
All of this and a lot of other things have gotten into Mikhaylov's mind. And again, his face was radiant.
'Yes, and how this figure was made, how much air.
'It is possible to go around,' said Golenishchev, showing clearly by this observation that he does not approve of the content and thought of the figure.
'Yes, a remarkable skill!' said Vronsky. 'How these figures stand out in the background!
Here's the technique,' he said, turning to Golenishchev, and with this insinuating a previous conversation between them that he was desperate to acquire this technique.
'Yeah, yeah, it's amazing! 'Reconfirmed by Golenishchev and Anna.
Despite the excruciating state in which he was, the remark about the technique was piercing hard on Mikhaylov's heart, and he suddenly pissed himself off when he looked at Vronski.
He often heard the word technique and was determined not to understand what it meant.
He knew that by that word they understood the mechanical ability to write and draw, completely independent of the content.
He often noticed, as in true praise, that technology was opposed to internal dignity, as if you could write good things that were bad.
He knew that it took a lot of attention and caution not to cut the cover, to damage the work itself, and to remove all the cover; but the art of writing, there was no technology.
If the little child or his cook were also exposed to what he saw, she would also be able to hatch what she saw.
And the most experienced and skilled painter could not write anything with the same mechanical ability if it had not been opened before the maintenance boundary.
Besides, he saw that if we were talking about technology, he couldn't be praised for it.
In everything he wrote and wrote, he saw the faults that cut his eyes from the carelessness with which he removed the veils, and which he could no longer repair without ruining the whole work.
And on almost all the shapes and faces, he saw the remains of the not quite removed coverings that ruined the painting.
'One thing to say is, if you would allow me to make this observation...' observed Golenishchev.
'Ah, I am very pleased and beseech you,' said Michaelov, pretending to smile.
'It is that you have a man's man, not a man of God.'
Anyway, I know that's what you wanted.
'I couldn't write the Christ that I didn't have in my soul,' said Michaelov, darkly.
'Yes, but in that case, if you allow me to speak your mind...'
Your picture is so good that my comment can't hurt her, and then it's my personal opinion. That's not what you have.
The motive is different. But let's take Ivanov.
I believe that if Christ is reduced to a degree of history, it would be better for Ivanov to choose another historical topic, fresh, untouched.
'But if this is the greatest subject that art represents?'
'If you look, there will be others.
But the thing is, art doesn't tolerate debate and reasoning.
And in the painting of Ivanov, for a believer and for an unbeliever, is the question whether it is God or not? and destroys the unity of the impression.
'Why not?'
It seems to me that for educated people, 'Mihailov said,' a dispute can no longer exist.
Golenishchev did not agree with this, and by sticking to his first thought of the only impression needed for art, he smashed Mikhaylov.
Michaelov was worried, but he couldn't say anything to defend his mind...
Anna and Wronsky had a long look at their friend's clever talk, and at last he crossed over without waiting for the master to see another, small painting.
'Oh, what a beauty, what a beauty!
A miracle!
That's so cute! They're talking in one voice.
"What did they like so much?" 'I thought of the Michaels.' He forgot about this written painting three years ago.
Forgot all the suffering and excitement he had experienced with that painting, when she had spent a few months alone, day and night, forgetting how he always forgot about the finished paintings.
He didn't even like to look at her, and he threw her out just because he was waiting for an Englishman to buy her.
'That's right, that's a long time ago,' he said.
'How good! 'Said Golenishchev, who too obviously fell into the beauty of the painting.
Two boys in the shadow of the crustite caught fish with sticks.
One, the eldest, had just thrown a rod and carefully pulled the float out of the bush, all absorbed in the case; the other, younger, lay on the grass, blocking the convoluted blonde head on his hands, and looked at the water with thoughtful blue eyes.
What was he thinking?
His admiration for this painting moved his previous excitement in Michaelov, but he feared and did not like this idle feeling for the past, and therefore, while he was happy with those praises, he wanted to distract visitors to the third painting.
But he asked if the painting was for sale.
For Michaelov now, excited by the visitors, it was very unpleasant to talk about the money business.
'It is displayed for sale,' he answered, drowning.
When the visitors left, Michaelov sat down against the painting of Pilate and Christ and in his mind repeated what had been said, though not said, but implied by those visitors.
And weirdly, what mattered so much to him when they were here and when he thought about their point of view suddenly lost all meaning to him.
He began to look at his picture with all his full artistic eyes and came to a state of confidence in perfection and, therefore, in the greatness of his picture that he needed to eliminate all the other interests in which he could work.
Christ's leg wasn't right from the point of view.
He took a palette and started working.
When he corrected his leg, he constantly looked at John's figure in the background, which the visitors did not notice, but which he knew was the best of perfection.
When he finished his leg, he wanted to take this figure, but he felt too excited for it.
He couldn't work in the same way when he was cold, as he was when he was too soft and he saw too much.
There was only one step in this transition from the cold to the inspiration at which work was possible.
And now he's too excited. He wanted to close the painting, but stopped and, holding the sheet with his hand, smiled blissfully, looked at John's figure for a long time.
Finally, as if with sadness he was tearing down the sheet and, tired but happy, he went to his place.
On their return to their homes, Holmes, Anna, and Golenishchev were particularly busy and entertained.
They were talking about Michaelov and his paintings.
The word of talent by which they understood their natural, almost physical ability, independent of mind and heart, and to which they wanted to name everything that was experienced by an artist, was particularly common in their conversation, as it was necessary for them to call what they had no idea but wanted to talk about.
They said that he could not be denied talent, but that his talent could not develop from a lack of education -- the common misery of our Russian artists.
But the picture of the boys fell into their minds, and no, no, they went back to her. 'What a beauty!
How he did it and how easy it was!
He doesn't know how good it is.
Yeah, we shouldn't miss it and buy it,' he said.
XIII
Michaelov sold his picture and agreed to make a portrait of Anna.
On the appointed day, he came and began his work.
The portrait of the fifth session struck everyone, especially the one of Wronsky, not only with resemblance, but also with special beauty.
It was weird how Michailov could find that special beauty of hers.
"I should have known and loved her, as I loved, to find that sweetest expression of her mind," he thought, although by that portrait he had only learned of that sweetest expression of hers.
But the expression was so true that he and others felt that they knew him a long time ago.
'How long have I been beating and done nothing,' he said about his portrait, 'and he looked and wrote.
That's what technology means.
'This will come,' comforted him by Golenishchev, whose sense of talent and, above all, education gave him a lofty view of art.
Golenishchev's conviction in his talent was also supported by his need for compassion and praise for his articles and thoughts, and he felt that praise and support should be mutual.
In someone else's house, and especially in the palazzo at the Vronski Michails, he was a completely different man than he was at his studio.
He was indecently respectful, as if he feared coming closer to people he did not respect.
He called yourself your ladyship, and never, despite the invitations of Anna and Vronski, stayed for lunch or came but for sessions.
Anna was more than anyone else, fond of him and grateful for her portrait.
He was more than courteous with him and apparently interested in the artist's judgment about his painting.
Golenishchev didn't miss a chance to insinuate Michailov with real concepts of art.
But Mikhaylov remained equally cold for everyone.
Anna felt that he liked to look at her; but he avoided talking to her.
He continued to keep silent and to keep silent when he was shown a picture of him, and apparently he was burdened by Golenishchev's conversations and did not object to him.
As a matter of fact, they didn't like the Mikhaylov's self-restraint and distasteful, as if hostile, attitude when they got to know him. And they were happy when the sessions ended, and there was a beautiful portrait in their hands, and he stopped walking.
Golenishchev was the first to express the thought that everyone had -- exactly that Mikhaylov was just jealous of Vronski.
'Let's say, he's not jealous because he has a talent: but he's upset that a courtman and a rich man is still a count (they hate all this), doing the same thing without much difficulty, if not better than he, who has dedicated his entire life to it.
It's about an education he doesn't have.
He defended Michailov, but deep down, he believed it because he understood that the man of another, the lower world, was to be jealous.
Anna &apos; s portrait, the same one written by him and Mikhaylov, should have shown the difference between him and Mikhaylov, but he did not see it.
It was only after Michailov that he stopped writing his portrait of Anna, thinking it was no longer necessary.
He continued his picture of medieval life.
Both he and Golenishchev, and in particular Anna, found that she was very good because she was much more like famous paintings than Mikhaylov's.
In the meantime, although Anna's portrait was very attractive to him, Michaelov was even more pleased than they were when the sessions were over and he didn't have to listen to Golenishchev any more about art, and we could forget the paintings.
He knew that he should not be prohibited from spoiling his paintings; he knew that he and all amateurs had every right to write what they wanted, but he hated it.
You can't stop a man from making a big wax doll and kissing it.
But if this man with the doll came and sat down before the lover, and began to caress his doll, as the lover cares for the one he loves, it would be unpleasant for the lover.
The same unpleasant feeling was felt by the Michails when they saw the painting of Deuteronomy; it was both funny and disheartening, and pitiful and insulting.
The fascination of the city's paintings and the Middle Ages did not last long.
He had so much taste in painting that he couldn't finish his painting.
The painting stopped. He felt vaguely that the shortcomings of her, little visible at the beginning, would be amazing if he continued.
The same thing happened to Golenishchev, who feels that he has nothing to say, and who constantly deceives himself that the thought is not ripe, that he carries it and prepares the materials.
But Golenishchev was angry and tormented, but he could not deceive and torment himself, and especially be angry.
He was determined to stop painting without explaining or excusing himself.
But without this exercise, his and Anna's life, surprised by his disappointment, seemed so bored in the Italian city, the palazzo suddenly became so obviously old and dirty, so unpleasantly looking at the stains on the garrisons, the cracks on the floors, the broken plaster on the carnis, and so bored all the same Golenishchev, the Italian professor and the German traveler, that it was necessary to change life.
They decided to go to Russia, to the village.
In Petersburg, Wronsky intended to share with his brother, and Anna intended to see her son.
In the summer, however, they intended to live in a large family home in the city of Wronski.
XIV
Levin was married for the third month.
He was happy, but he wasn't as happy as he expected.
At every turn, he found disappointment in his old dreams and a new unexpected charm.
Levin was happy, but when he entered the family life, he saw at every step that it was not at all what he imagined.
At every step, he experienced the experience of a man who loved the smooth, happy passage of the boat on the lake after he had taken the boat himself.
He saw that it was not enough to sit still without swinging -- you have to think about it, not forgetting for a moment where to swim, that under your feet you have to roam, and that unusual hands hurt, that it's easy to look at it, and that it's very happy to do it, but it's very difficult to do it.
When he was single, looking at someone else's marital life, petty care, quarreling, jealousy, he smiled in the shower with contempt.
Not only could there be no such thing in his future marriage, he believed, but even all external forms seemed to him to be completely different from the lives of others.
And all of a sudden, his life with his wife didn't turn out to be special, but, on the contrary, it was all made up of the most insignificant things that he had despised so much before, but that now, against his will, were given extraordinary and incontrovertible significance.
And Levin saw that the device of all these little things wasn't as easy as he thought it would be.
Despite Levin's belief that he had the most precise concepts of family life, he, like all men, imagined an involuntary family life only as a pleasure of love, from which nothing should have been prevented and from which little care should not have been diverted.
He was supposed to work his job and rest from it in the happiness of love.
She was supposed to be loved, that's all.
But he, like all men, forgot she had to work. And he wondered how she, this poetic, adorable Kitty, could, in the first few weeks, not only think, remember and care about tablecloths, furniture, visitors' tuffs, trays, cooks, lunches, etc.
As an ex-fiancé, he was struck by the certainty with which she refused to travel abroad and decided to go to the village, as if she knew something she needed, and, apart from her love, could think of someone else.
This insulted him then, and now several times her petty troubles and concerns have insulted him.
But he saw that she needed it. And when he loved her, though he did not understand why, even though he laughed at these concerns, he could not help but look at them.
He laughed at the way she was setting up furniture brought from Moscow, how she was cleaning her room and his room in a new way, how she hung her wardrobes, how she distributed the future guest room for Dolly, how she arranged the room for her new girlfriend, how she ordered lunch for an old cook, how she was in a dispute with Agatha Mikhaylovna, keeping her from eating.
He saw that the old chef smiled, admiring her and listening to her illustrious, impossible orders; he saw that Agatha Mikhaylovna shoved her head gently and gently to the new orders of the young lady in the storeroom; he saw that Kitty was adorably sweet when she came to him, laughing and crying, to announce that Mary's girlfriend was used to believing that she was a young lady and that no one was listening to her.
He thought it was nice, but weird, and he thought he'd be better off without it.
He didn't know the feeling of change she felt after she sometimes wanted kaws or candy cabbages at home, and neither could have, and now she could order what she wanted, buy a bunch of candy, spend as much money as she wanted and order whatever cake she wanted.
She was now happy to dream of Dolly coming with her children, especially because she'd order her favorite cakes for the kids, and Dolly would appreciate all her new devices.
She didn't know why or why, but the household was inexorably attracted to her.
She instinctively sensed the coming of spring, knowing that there would be days that weren't for real, the wile of her nest as well as she could, and she rushed at the same time and shoved it and learned how to do it.
This petty concern of Kitty, so contrary to Levin's ideal of the great happiness of the first time, was one of the disappointments; and this sweet concern, which he did not understand but could not but love, was one of the new charms.
Another disappointment and charm were the quarrels.
Levin never imagined that there could be a relationship between him and his wife other than a gentle, respectful, loving one, and suddenly they had an argument from the first days, so she told him that he didn't love her, loved himself alone, cried and waved her hands.
The first time they fought was that Levin went to the new cockroach and stayed half an hour, because he wanted to drive by the next road and got lost.
He was driving home just thinking about her, about her love, about his happiness, and the closer he came, the more tenderness to her grew in him.
He ran into the room with the same feeling and even stronger than the one he came to Scherbatsky to propose. And suddenly he was met with a dark expression he had never seen in it.
He wanted to kiss her, she pushed him away.
'What are you?
'You're having fun...' she began, wanting to be calmly poisoned.
But she just opened her mouth, like the words of the reproach of pointless jealousy, all that tormented her in the half hour that she had spent standing still sitting on the window, broke out of her.
It was only the first time he understood what he did not understand when he took her out of the church after the crown. He realized that she wasn't only close to him, but that he didn't know where she ended up and he started.
He understood that by the excruciating feeling of doubleness that he was experiencing at this moment.
He was insulted at the first minute, but the second he felt that he couldn't be offended by her, that she was himself.
He felt at the first moment the same way that a person felt when, suddenly having a strong blow from behind, he turned back to find the guilty person and made sure that he had accidentally struck himself, that he had no one to be angry with, and that the pain had to be put to rest.
He never felt that strong after that, but this first time he couldn't remember much.
The natural feeling required him to defend himself, to prove her guilt; but to prove her guilt was to further annoy her and to make more of a breakup that was the cause of all grief.
One of his usual feelings moved him to take the blame off himself and into her; another feeling, stronger, led him to make amends as soon as possible, preventing the breakup from widening.
It was painful to remain with such an unfair accusation, but it made her feel even worse when she was acquitted.
As a person in a half-sleep pain, he wanted to tear off a sick spot, throw it away, and when he remembered, he felt that the sick spot was himself.
All you had to do was help a sick place get over it, and he tried to do it.
They made up.
When she realized her guilt but did not express it, she became tender to him, and they experienced a new, double happiness of love.
But this did not prevent these clashes from happening again, and even more often, for the most unexpected and negligible reasons.
These clashes often occurred because they did not yet know what was important to each other, and because they were both often in a bad mood all along in the first place.
When one was in good and the other was in bad, the world was not broken, but when the two were in a bad position, the clashes arose out of so little reason that they could never remember what they were fighting about.
True, when they were both in a good mood, the joy of life doubled. But it was a difficult time for them at first.
In all this early years, there was a particular sense of tension, as if twitching both sides of the chain they were connected to.
In fact, that honeymoon, that is, the month after the wedding, from which Levin had traditionally expected so much, was not only a honeymoon, but remained in the memory of both of them the most difficult and humiliating time of their lives.
They both tried in the same way in later life to remove from their minds all the ugly, shameful circumstances of this unhealthy time, when they were both rarely in a normal mood, rarely in themselves.
Only for the third month of marriage, after their return from Moscow, where they travelled for a month, their lives became evener.
XV
They just arrived from Moscow and were happy to be alone.
He sat in the office by the desk and wrote.
She, in that dark-leaf dress she wore the first days of her marriage, and now she's wearing it again, which was especially memorable and dear to him, sat on the couch, on the very leather old sofa, which was always in the office of Levin's grandfather and father, and made broderie anglaise.
He thought and wrote, not losing his joy at her presence.
His studies and his household and the book in which the foundations of the new economy were to be set forth were not left to them; but as before, these activities and thoughts seemed to him small and insignificant in comparison with the darkness that had covered his whole life, they were no longer important and small in comparison with the bright light of the life to come.
He continued his studies, but now felt that the focus of his attention had shifted to another one and that, as a result, he had a very different and clearer view of the case.
It used to be a lifesaver for him.
He had previously felt that without this work his life would be too dark. Now, however, he needed these lessons so that life would not be too uniform.
Having taken his papers again, having read what was written, he was pleased to find that it was worth it.
The case was new and useful. Many of his earlier thoughts seemed redundant and extreme, but many of the gaps became clear to him when he refreshed his memory.
He now wrote a new chapter on the reasons for the disadvantage of farming in Russia.
He argued that Russia &apos; s poverty was not only due to the misallocation of land ownership and false direction, but that Russia &apos; s recent unnormalization of external civilization, especially the routes of communication, had contributed to it by the railways, which had led to the centralization of cities, the development of luxury and, consequently, to the detriment of farming, the development of the factory industry, credit and its satellite, the exchange game.
He felt that, with the normal development of wealth in the State, all of these phenomena came only when agriculture was already under considerable pressure, when it was under the right conditions, at least under certain conditions; that the country &apos; s wealth had to grow evenly and in particular so that other sectors of wealth did not exceed agriculture; that according to the well-known state of agriculture, the ways in which it was managed should be appropriate to it and to the way in which it was connected; and that, in our misuse of the land, railways, which were caused not by economic but political necessity, were premature and, instead of promoting the farming that was expected of them, by ahead of agriculture and by encouraging the development of industry and credit, had stopped it; and that, as well as the unilateral and premature development of the animal organ would impede its overall development, so for the overall development of wealth in Russia, the credit, the means of communication, the intensification of the factory activities that were clearly needed in Europe, where they were timely, had only done harm to us by removing the main question of the organization of farming.
In the meantime, while writing her own, she was thinking about how uninvited her husband was with the young Prince of Charski, who was very tender to her on the eve of her departure.
'Cause he's jealous,' she thought. 'Oh, my God! I don't know how cute and stupid he is.
He's jealous of me!
If he knew they were all like Peter's cook to me,' she thought, looking at her strange sense of ownership of his head and red neck. 'It is a pity to keep him out of class, but he will!) have to look at his face; will he feel that I'm looking at him?
I want him to turn around...
I want to, well!" 'And she opened her eyes wide, seeking to increase the effect of her eyes.
'Yes, they distract themselves with all the juices and give false gloss,' he muttered, stopping to write, and feeling that she was looking at him and smiling, looked back.
'What? 'He asked, smiling and rising up.'
"I looked back," she thought.
'Nothing, I wanted you to look back,' she said, looking at him and wondering whether he was upset or not that she had ripped him off.
'Well, how good it is for the two of us!
I mean,' he said, approaching her with a smile of happiness.
'I feel so good!